Mississippi, session 2026, HB612.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  An entity of the state, and any unit or subdivision thereof, may enter into an intergovernmental support agreement with a branch of the Armed Forces of the United States under the National Defense Authorization Act, 10 USC Section 2679, to provide installation-support services to a military installation located in this state. SECTION 2. Section 73-15-21, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-15-21.  (1)  Licensed practical nurse applicant qualifications.  Any applicant for a license to practice practical nursing as a licensed practical nurse shall submit to the board: (a)  An attested written application on a Board of Nursing form; (b)  A diploma from an approved high school or the equivalent thereof, as determined by the appropriate educational agency; (c)  Written official evidence of completion of a practical nursing program approved by the State Department of Education through its Division of Vocational Education, or one approved by a legal accrediting agency of another state, territory or possession of the United States, the District of Columbia, or a foreign country which is satisfactory to this board; (d)  Evidence of competence in English related to nursing, provided the first language is not English; (e)  Any other official records required by the board. (2)  Licensed practical nurse applicant qualifications for military medics.  Any applicant for a license to practice practical nursing as a licensed practical nurse who is a United States Army Combat Medic Specialist, a United States Navy Hospital Corpsman, * * *or a United States Air Force Aerospace Medical Service Specialist, or a United States Coast Guard Health Services Technician shall submit to the board: (a)  An attested written application on a Board of Nursing form; (b)  A diploma from an approved high school or the equivalent thereof, as determined by the appropriate educational agency; (c)  Written official evidence of completion of the training required for a United States Army Combat Medic Specialist, a United States Navy Hospital Corpsman, * * *or a United States Air Force Aerospace Medical Service Specialist, or a United States Coast Guard Health Services Technician and after such training, completion of two (2) years of clinical experience that involves providing direct patient care, which may include trauma or emergency oriented care; (d)  Evidence of competence in English related to nursing, provided the first language is not English; (e)  Any other official records required by the board. (3)  Additional requirements for applicants.  In addition to the requirements specified in paragraphs (a) through (e) of subsection (1) or (2) of this section, in order to qualify for a license to practice practical nursing as a licensed practical nurse, an applicant must have successfully been cleared for licensure through an investigation that shall consist of a determination as to good moral character and verification that the prospective licensee is not guilty of or in violation of any statutory ground for denial of licensure as set forth in Section 73-15-29 or guilty of any offense specified in Section 73-15-33.  To assist the board in conducting its licensure investigation, all applicants shall undergo a fingerprint-based criminal history records check of the Mississippi central criminal database and the Federal Bureau of Investigation criminal history database.  Each applicant shall submit a full set of his or her fingerprints in a form and manner prescribed by the board, which shall be forwarded to the Mississippi Department of Public Safety (department) and the Federal Bureau of Investigation Identification Division for this purpose. Any and all state or national criminal history records information obtained by the board that is not already a matter of public record shall be deemed nonpublic and confidential information restricted to the exclusive use of the board, its members, officers, investigators, agents and attorneys in evaluating the applicant's eligibility or disqualification for licensure, and shall be exempt from the Mississippi Public Records Act of 1983.  Except when introduced into evidence in a hearing before the board to determine licensure, no such information or records related thereto shall, except with the written consent of the applicant or by order of a court of competent jurisdiction, be released or otherwise disclosed by the board to any other person or agency. The board shall provide to the department the fingerprints of the applicant, any additional information that may be required by the department, and a form signed by the applicant consenting to the check of the criminal records and to the use of the fingerprints and other identifying information required by the state or national repositories. The board shall charge and collect from the applicant, in addition to all other applicable fees and costs, such amount as may be incurred by the board in requesting and obtaining state and national criminal history records information on the applicant. The board may, in its discretion, refuse to accept the application of any person who has been convicted of a criminal offense under any provision of Title 97 of the Mississippi Code of 1972, as now or hereafter amended, or any provision of this article. (4)  Licensure by examination.  (a)  Upon the board being satisfied that an applicant for a license as a practical nurse has met the qualifications set forth in subsection (1) or (2) of this section and subsection (3) of this section, the board shall proceed to examine such applicant in such subjects as the board shall, in its discretion, determine.  The subjects in which applicants shall be examined shall be in conformity with curricula in schools of practical nursing approved by the State Department of Education. (b)  The applicant shall be required to pass the written examination selected by the board. (c)  Upon successful completion of such examination, the board shall issue to the applicant a license to practice as a licensed practical nurse. (d)  The board may use any part or all of the state board test pool examination for practical nurse licensure, its successor examination, or any other nationally standardized examination identified by the board in its rules.  The passing score shall be established by the board in its rules. (5)  Licensure by endorsement.  The board may issue a license to practice practical nursing as a licensed practical nurse without examination to an applicant who has been duly licensed as a licensed practical nurse under the laws of another state, territory or possession of the United States, the District of Columbia, or a foreign country if, in the opinion of the board, the applicant meets the qualifications required of licensed practical nurses in this state and has previously achieved the passing score or scores on the licensing examination required by this state at the time of his or her graduation.  The issuance of a license by endorsement to a military-trained applicant, military spouse or person who establishes residence in this state shall be subject to the provisions of Section 73-50-1 or 73-50-2, as applicable. (6)  Licensure by equivalent amount of theory and clinical experience.  In the discretion of the board, former students of a state-accredited school preparing students to become registered nurses may be granted permission to take the examination for licensure to practice as a licensed practical nurse, provided the applicant's record or transcript indicates the former student completed an equivalent amount of theory and clinical experiences as required of a graduate of a practical nursing program, and provided the school attended was, at the time of the student's attendance, an accredited school of nursing. (7)  Requirements for rewriting the examination.  The board shall establish in its rules the requirements for rewriting the examination for those persons failing the examination on the first writing or subsequent writing. (8)  Fee.  The applicant applying for a license by examination or by endorsement to practice as a licensed practical nurse shall pay a fee not to exceed Sixty Dollars ($60.00) to the board. (9)  Temporary permit.  (a) The board may issue a temporary permit to practice practical nursing to a graduate of an approved school of practical nursing pending the results of the examination in Mississippi, and to a qualified applicant from another state, territory or possession of the United States, or the District of Columbia, pending licensing procedures as provided for elsewhere in this article.  The fee shall not exceed Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00). (b)  The board may issue a temporary permit for a period of ninety (90) days to a licensed practical nurse who is currently licensed in another state, territory or possession of the United States or the District of Columbia and who is an applicant for licensure by endorsement.  Such permit is not renewable except by board action.  The issuance of a temporary permit to a military-trained applicant, military spouse or person who establishes residence in this state shall be subject to the provisions of Section 73-50-1 or 73-50-2, as applicable. (c)  The board may issue a temporary permit to a graduate of an approved practical nursing education program or an equivalent program satisfactory to the board pending the results of the first licensing examination scheduled after application. Such permit is not renewable except by board action. (d)  The board may issue a temporary permit for a period of thirty (30) days to any licensed practical nurse during the time enrolled in a nursing reorientation program. This time period may be extended by board action.  The fee shall not exceed Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00). (e)  The board may adopt such regulations as are necessary to limit the practice of persons to whom temporary permits are issued. (10)  Title and abbreviation.  Any person who holds a license or holds the privilege to practice as a licensed practical nurse in this state shall have the right to use the title "licensed practical nurse" and the abbreviation "L.P.N."  No other person shall assume such title or use such abbreviation, or any words, letters, signs or devices to indicate that a person using the same is a licensed practical nurse. (11)  Licensed practical nurses licensed under a previous law.  Any person holding a license to practice nursing as a practical nurse issued by this board which is valid on July 1, 1981, shall thereafter be deemed to be licensed as a practical nurse under the provisions of this article upon payment of the fee prescribed in Section 73-15-27. (12)  Each application or filing made under this section shall include the social security number(s) of the applicant in accordance with Section 93-11-64. SECTION 3. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.